New Jersey, session 221, S4448.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The prohibitory provisions of Title 45 of the Revised Statutes related to the issuance of licenses and the practice of health care professions shall not apply to any health care professional licensed in a foreign nation to provide services only to athletes or team personnel affiliated with the team of the foreign nation that is participating in the 2026 Fédération Internationale de Football Association (FIFA) World Cup. 2.    This act shall take effect June 1, 2026 and expire July 31, 2026.